District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.10

Rulemaking authority.

On or before December 1, 2007, the Office of the Chief Tenant Advocate shall promulgate rules, subject to Council approval, to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2068b
as added Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 2(g), 53 DCR 6703
Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”